Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1003
Trail Development Assistance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Trail Development Assistance Fund is hereby created. The fund shall consist of any direct appropriation by the Legislature and any funds received as gifts, bequests, or other contributions to such fund from public or private entities. The fund shall be administered by the Game and Parks Commission and shall be used to assist in the purchase, development, and maintenance of recreational trails within the state. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 24;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-1503;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 378.
January 1, 2010
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.